Massachusetts, session 194th, S2287.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11F1/2 of chapter 25A of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding at the end of subsection (a) the following:-
For intermediate or large generation units, no woody biomass fuel shall be considered an
alternative energy supply.
SECTION 2. This act shall not apply to any biomass facility qualified by the department
of energy resources as an alternative energy unit pursuant to section 11F1/2 of chapter 25A of
the General Laws as of January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1